California, session 20252026, SB818.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as Taylen and Wyatt’s Law.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)During the 1971–72 Regular Session, Assembly Bill 660 was passed and signed into law, placing a four-year moratorium on the hunting of mountain lions.(b)At that time, there was great debate over the health of mountain lion populations, but the Department of Fish and Wildlife had no factual evidence on the health of the species.(c)At that time, the “popular” estimate of 600 mountain lions in the state had been in use since 1919, and was based on the formula of one mountain lion to each township of mountain lion habitat within California’s boundaries.(d)Assembly Bill 660 had two major project goals: first, the establishment of a population estimate for the mountain lion in California; and second, the production of a science-based mountain lion management plan based on life history information.(e)Assembly Bill 660 temporarily prohibited the lethal hunting of mountain lions, but it did not prohibit the Department of Fish and Wildlife from issuing permits for the nonlethal pursuit of the species by hound handlers with purpose-bred scent hounds, also known as houndspersons.(f)During this period, the depredation of livestock by mountain lions and human encounters with mountain lions was nearly nonexistent.(g)The temporary moratorium placed on mountain lion hunting by the passage of Assembly Bill 660 was extended several times due to assessing the mountain lion populations and developing the management plan proving to be more complex and time-consuming than originally anticipated.(h)Eighteen years later, although mountain lion populations were still considered stable and healthy by most biologists in our state, the species was designated as a “specially protected mammal” via the narrow passage of Proposition 117, an initiative measure approved by the electors at the June 5, 1990, statewide primary election. As the state wildlife laboratory noted in a published paper, this special protection was a “political designation, with no basis in population abundance or trend.”(i)The passage of Proposition 117 in 1990 prohibited the taking, injury, possession, or sale of mountain lion parts in California in perpetuity. By extension, Proposition 117 also banned the nonlethal pursuit and treeing of mountain lions with hounds.(j)For the first five years following the passage of Proposition 117, both mountain lion depredation on livestock and attacks on humans dramatically escalated, including two human fatalities. In response, the Department of Fish and Wildlife increased the issuance of lethal depredation permits, which diminished the rate of mountain lion encounters for the next 15 years.(k)On July 10, 2020, the Department of Fish and Wildlife implemented a “Statewide Mountain Lion Depredation Approach” that required the issuance of often multiple nonlethal depredation permits for a problem mountain lion before the issuance of a lethal depredation permit. Concomitant with this new depredation policy, attacks on humans again quickly escalated, including the midday fatal attack on a 21-year-old man in the County of El Dorado in March 2024.(l)The absence of houndspersons placing nonlethal pressure on mountain lions for the past 35 years has resulted in changes in their behavior. Traditionally nocturnal hunters and highly elusive, mountain lions now lack a fear of humans and domestic dogs, and are commonly sighted during the middle of the day, frequently around residential areas, resulting in substantially heightened public safety concerns and an exponential increase in the depredation of livestock and pets.(m)In the County of El Dorado, well over 200 domestic animals were killed by mountain lions in 2024 alone, and daytime mountain lion sightings are commonly occurring in every community on the western slope, including suburban neighborhoods and school yards.(n)In 2024, mountain lions were sighted on the campus of two of the three high schools on the County of El Dorado’s western slope.(o)The citizens and leadership of the County of El Dorado are doing everything possible to mitigate the remarkable increase in mountain lion activity and livestock loss by implementing all the traditional methods of deterring mountain lion conflict, including keeping livestock in fully fenced enclosures, bringing animals in at night, not leaving doors open so pets can go in and out at night, and the use of trained dogs, lights, and radios. Yet mountain lion encounters continue to escalate.(p)Recent peer-reviewed and published scientific studies have documented that preemptive or “proactive” pressure via nonlethal hound pursuit is the most effective method for hazing mountain lions and strongly reinforces their historic tendency to avoid humans and domestic dogs.(q)Current state policy on the issuance of depredation permits for dealing with problem mountain lions only allows hazing of mountain lions by government trappers after the first kill and typically requires multiple kills on the same parcel before issuing a lethal depredation permit. The implementation of this strict “after the damage is done” state policy has further escalated the changing mountain lion dynamics in the County of El Dorado, leading to the crisis county residents are currently experiencing.(r)In the County of El Dorado, the recent fatal human attack, combined with the ongoing increase in mountain lion sightings, their aggressive behavior, and daytime attacks on domestic animals and pets, is causing a swell of grief, anger, and fear throughout the public.(s)The County of El Dorado has become a hot spot for mountain lion encounters, and escalating public safety concerns require a special management strategy that is regionalized and tailored to address these unique circumstances.(t)Since the passage of Proposition 117, the lack of any preemptive, nonlethal pursuit of the species by houndspersons with scent hounds to restore mountain lion fear of humans and dogs has substantially promoted an upsurge in their willingness to confront humans, livestock, and pets, resulting in an increase in the legal, lethal taking of problem mountain lions via depredation permit, and likely the illegal removal of many more.(u)We must learn from the past, particularly during the 18 years in that California did not allow lethal-take mountain lion hunting, but did authorize permitted, experienced houndspersons with trained dogs to pursue, tree, and then release mountain lions. Reestablishing a fear of humans and dogs in mountain lions by reinstating their proactive, nonlethal pursuit by qualified and permitted houndspersons with hounds will substantially mitigate rapidly increasing public safety concerns, the loss of livestock and pets, and save the lives of countless mountain lions in the future.(a) The foothills of the Sierra Nevada, particularly in the County of El Dorado, are a “hot spot” for human-mountain lion conflicts.(b) In the County of El Dorado, residents reported over 200 domestic animals killed by mountain lions in 2024, and sightings of mountain lions during the day and on or near the campuses of two western slope high schools. Tragically, two young brothers were badly attacked, one fatally, by a juvenile male mountain lion while looking for shed antlers in the spring of 2024.(c) Multiple factors have been suggested as the cause of the increased human-mountain lion conflict, including recent nearby catastrophic wildfires, changes in deer population dynamics, the feeding of wildlife, fragmented habitat, and others. It may be that there is no single dominant cause.(d) To protect public health and safety, the Department of Fish and Wildlife expanded its efforts to work on wildlife response management. The Human-Wildlife Conflicts program’s vision is to proactively address human-wildlife conflicts and improve wildlife incident responses; to support safe human-wildlife interactions; and to increase understanding, awareness, and appreciation of wildlife in California. Due to funding challenges, these positions have not been maintained statewide.(e) The Department of Fish and Wildlife regional office serving the County of El Dorado was able to maintain personnel dedicated to human-wildlife conflicts last year at least temporarily despite the lack of specific funding.(f) The Department of Fish and Wildlife also has a research project underway in the County of El Dorado to develop improved strategies to reduce human-mountain lion conflicts. This project includes the hazing of mountain lions.(g) Due to voter approval of Proposition 117, an initiative measure approved by the voters at the June 5, 1990, statewide direct primary election, mountain lions are a specially protected species in the state, and cannot be hunted or otherwise subject to take. Depredation permits to kill mountain lions that are a risk to public health and safety are required to be issued. The owner of livestock who encounters a mountain lion pursuing, injuring, or killing livestock is authorized to immediately kill the mountain lion. Bills affecting the laws affecting mountain lions instituted by Proposition 117 may only be changed with a 4/5 vote of both houses of the Legislature and the Governor’s approval. Therefore, broad consensus is needed to amend the mountain lion statutes.(h) In order to protect public safety, it is critically important to ensure that the Department of Fish and Wildlife’s efforts to reduce human-mountain lion conflicts in the County of El Dorado are maintained, enhanced, and expanded upon. The Department of Fish and Wildlife existing resources are inadequate and its service level gaps have been repeatedly identified through its Service Based Budgeting efforts.SEC. 3.Section 4801.6 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:4801.6.(a)The department shall, no later than January 1, 2027, develop a pilot program to collect data on the efficacy of authorizing permitted private houndspersons to proactively haze mountain lions deemed to be a potential threat to public safety, livestock, or other domestic animals by the department, animal damage control officer, or local enforcement agency.(b)The pilot program described in subdivision (a) shall be known and may be referred to as “Tree and Free,” and shall be limited to the County of El Dorado. The pilot program shall be operative for five years from the date that it commences.(c)In developing the pilot program, the department shall collaborate with appropriate leadership and enforcement personnel of the County of El Dorado in order to define the area within the county where the pilot program shall be authorized.(d)(1)At the conclusion of the pilot program, the department shall, no later than January 1, 2033, provide a report to the Legislature and the Fish and Game Commission on the efficacy of permitted houndspersons proactively hazing mountain lions as a nonlethal deterrent for reducing threats to public safety, livestock, and domestic animals. The report shall also evaluate the feasibility and cost of expanding the program to other areas experiencing an increased risk of encounters with problem mountain lions.(2)The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2037, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(3)A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(e)As used in this section, “qualified individuals” shall include any authorized or permitted houndsperson, as described in Section 4808.SEC. 4.Section 4808 of the Fish and Game Code is amended to read:4808.(a)As used in this chapter, “agent” means the agent or employee of the owner of the damaged or destroyed property, any county or city predator control officer, any employee of the Animal Damage Control Section of the United States Department of Agriculture, any departmental personnel, or any authorized or permitted houndsperson registered with the department as possessing the requisite experience and having no prior conviction of any provision of this code or regulation adopted pursuant to this code. A plea of nolo contendere is a conviction for purposes of this section.(b)The department shall collaborate with federal, state, and county trapping experts and interested nonprofit organizations that have goals and objectives directly related to the interests of houndspersons in developing the criteria and procedure for registering authorized or permitted houndspersons.(c)In order to participate in the pilot program authorized pursuant to Section 4801.6, houndspersons permitted and registered with the department shall purchase an annual hazing permit. The department shall determine the cost of the permit, not to exceed the cost of implementing the pilot program authorized pursuant to Section 4801.6.SEC. 3. Section 4811 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:4811. (a) The department shall maintain, enhance, and expand its human-mountain lion conflicts program in the County of El Dorado in order to protect public health and safety, including, but not limited to, by exercising its authority pursuant to Section 4801.5. The program shall include public education and outreach regarding methods to minimize conflict, including, but not limited to, methods to protect livestock and domestic animals, and the development of best practices to minimize conflicts.(b) The department shall develop and implement a grant program to assist eligible applicants, including local governments, to obtain, install, and maintain equipment and other measures in the County of El Dorado to protect livestock and domestic animals and minimize activities that attract mountain lions into communities.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 4811.2 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:4811.2. (a) The department shall continue and expand its scientific research effort in the County of El Dorado to develop and evaluate methods to deter mountain lions from communities and to prevent habituation, including improving understanding of the factors contributing to human-mountain lion conflicts.(b) The department shall consult with the Department of Parks and Recreation and local agencies to ensure department and department-supported activities pursuant to this section conform to law and regulation.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 4811.4 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:4811.4. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature in implementing Sections 4811 and 4811.2 that the department shall work closely with the community and local leaders of the County of El Dorado.(b) The department shall regularly attend public meetings of local government entities in the County of El Dorado to provide updates on the status of the efforts undertaken pursuant to Sections 4811 and 4811.2 and updates on depredation permitting, including the time between when a completed application is received and the depredation permit is issued.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 4811.6 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:4811.6. (a) The department may expand the programs developed pursuant to Sections 4811 and 4811.2 into regional programs, including in the County of El Dorado, if warranted and the commitment to, and efforts in, the County of El Dorado are maintained.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 7. Section 4811.8 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:4811.8. (a) The director shall appear at a hearing of the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water or the Assembly Committee on Water, Parks, and Wildlife annually until the 2033 calendar year to provide a status update on the programs developed pursuant to Sections 4811 and 4811.2.(b) On or before October 1, 2030, the department shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature describing the programs developed pursuant to Sections 4811 and 4811.2 and transmit the report to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water, the Assembly Committee on Water, Parks, and Wildlife, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Assembly Committee on Budget. The report shall include the results of the programs, the number of department personnel involved in the programs, and recommendations to further improve the programs to protect human health and safety.(c) (1) The requirement for submitting the report imposed under subdivision (b) is inoperative on October 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(2) The report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 5.SEC. 8. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the severity of mountain lion attacks that have occurred in the County of El Dorado.SEC. 6.SEC. 9. The Legislature finds and declares that the amendments made by this act are consistent with, and further the purposes of, the California Wildlife Protection Act of 1990.